lingvodoc/static/parsers/hfst/xal/rules.xfst
define CaseXxXAbl26715XxXR14 г -> 0 || ConsNG "ɛ" "ß" "+" _ а с ;
define CaseXxXAbl26715XxXR15 г -> 0 || ConsNG "ɛ" "ß" "+" _ ә с ;
define CaseXxXAbl26715XxXR16 г -> 0 || ConsNG "€" "+" _ а с ;
define CaseXxXAbl26715XxXR17 г -> 0 || ConsNG "€" "+" _ ә с ;
define CaseXxXAbl26715XxXR18 [ г а с ] -> [ һ а с ] || Vowels "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXAbl26715XxXR19 [ г ә с ] -> [ һ ә с ] || Vowels "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXAcc126726XxXR1 [ и г ] -> [ һ и г ] || ".#." Letters Letters Vowels "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXAcc126726XxXR2 н -> 0 || _ "+" и г ;
define CaseXxXAcc126726XxXR3 н -> 0 || _ "€" "+" и г ;
define CaseXxXAcc126726XxXR4 и -> 0 || Vowels "+" _ г ;
define CaseXxXAcc126726XxXR5 и -> 0 || Vowels "€" "+" _ г ;
define CaseXxXAcc126726XxXR6 [ и г ] -> [ г и г ] || NGCon "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXAcc126726XxXR7 [ һ и г ] -> [ һ и ] || _ "+" н ь ;
define CaseXxXAcc126726XxXR8 [ и г ] -> [ и һ ] || _ "+" а н ;
define CaseXxXAcc126732XxXR1 н -> 0 || _ "+" ы г ;
define CaseXxXAcc126732XxXR2 н -> 0 || _ "€" "+" ы г ;
define CaseXxXAssoc26741XxXR1 н -> 0 || _ "+" т а ;
define CaseXxXAssoc26741XxXR2 н -> 0 || _ "€" "+" т а ;
define CaseXxXAssoc26741XxXR3 а -> ә || SoftVowels [?*] "+" т _ ;
define CaseXxXAssoc26741XxXR4 н -> 0 || _ "+" т ә ;
define CaseXxXAssoc26741XxXR5 н -> 0 || _ "€" "+" т ә ;
define CaseXxXCom26752XxXR1 а -> ә || SoftVowels [?*] "+" л _ ;
define CaseXxXDat26764XxXR1 т -> д || Vowels "+" _ "}" ;
define CaseXxXDat26764XxXR2 т -> д || ConsDat "+" _ "}" ;
define CaseXxXDat26764XxXR3 т -> д || ConsDat "ɛ" "+" _ "}" ;
define CaseXxXDat26764XxXR4 т -> д || "ɛ" "+" _ "}" ;
define CaseXxXDat26764XxXR5 т -> д || "@" "ɛ" "+" _ "}" ;
define CaseXxXDat26764XxXR6 т -> д || "@" "ɛ" "$" "+" _ "}" ;
define CaseXxXDat26764XxXR7 т -> д || [ NazCons | LatCons ] "+" _ "}" ;
define CaseXxXDat26764XxXR8 т -> д || [ NazCons | LatCons ] "€" "+" _ "}" ;
define CaseXxXDir26769XxXR1 [ г у р ] -> [ ю р ] || н ь "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXDir26769XxXR2 ь -> 0 || _ "+" ю р ;
define CaseXxXDir26769XxXR3 [ г у р ] -> [ г ү р ] || SoftVowels[?*] "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXDir26769XxXR4 г -> 0 || ConsNG "+" _ у р ;
define CaseXxXDir26769XxXR5 г -> 0 || ConsNG "+" _ ү р ;
define CaseXxXDir26769XxXR6 г -> 0 || ConsNG "@" "+" _ у р ;
define CaseXxXDir26769XxXR7 г -> 0 || ConsNG "@" "+" _ ү р ;
define CaseXxXDir26769XxXR8 [ г у р ] -> [ һ у р ] || Vowels "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXDir26769XxXR9 [ г ү р ] -> [ һ ү р ] || Vowels "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXGen26774XxXR1 [ и н ] -> а || н "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXGen26774XxXR2 [ и н ] -> я || н ь "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXGen26774XxXR3 ь -> 0 || _ "+" я ;
define CaseXxXGen26774XxXR4 а -> ә || SoftVowels [?*] "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXGen26774XxXR5 [ и н ] -> [ г и н ] || NGCon "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXGen26774XxXR6 [ и н ] -> [ һ и н ] || Vowels Vowels "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXGen26774XxXR7 и -> 0 || Vowels "+" _ н ;
define CaseXxXGen26774XxXR8 ь -> 0 || _ "+" и н ;
define CaseXxXInst26802XxXR1 н -> 0 || _ "+"  г а р;
define CaseXxXInst26802XxXR2 [ г а р ] -> [ я р ] || н ь "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXInst26802XxXR3 ь -> 0 || _ "+" я р ;
define CaseXxXInst26802XxXR4 [ г а р ] -> [ г ә р ] || SoftVowels[?*] "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXInst26802XxXR5 г -> 0 || ConsNG "+" _ а р ;
define CaseXxXInst26802XxXR6 г -> 0 || ConsNG "+" _ ә р ;
define CaseXxXInst26802XxXR7 г -> 0 || ConsNG "@" "+" _ а р ;
define CaseXxXInst26802XxXR8 г -> 0 || ConsNG "@" "+" _ ә р ;
define CaseXxXInst26802XxXR9 [ г а р ] -> [ һ а р ] || Vowels "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXInst26802XxXR10 [ г ә р ] -> [ һ ә р ] || Vowels "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXTerm26812XxXR1 а -> ә || SoftVowels [?+] "+" ц _ ;
define CaseXxXVoc26817XxXR1 а -> ә || SoftVowels [?+] "+" _ ;
define NumXxXNum026827XxXR1 н -> 0 || _ "+" "^" а д ;
define NumXxXNum026827XxXR2 г -> җ || _ "+" "^" а д ;
define NumXxXNum026827XxXR3 н -> 0 || _ "+" "^" ә д ;
define NumXxXNum026827XxXR4 г -> җ || _ "+" "^" ә д ;
define NumXxXNum026827XxXR5 [ й р ] -> ш || _ "+" "^" а д ;
define NumberAdjXxXPl26830XxXR1 у -> ү || SoftVowels [?*] "+" ч _ д ;
define PossXxXPoss26848XxXR1 [ и н ь ] -> [ һ и н ь ] || Vowels "€" "{" "+" _ ;
define PossXxXPoss26848XxXR2 [ и н ь ] -> [ һ и н ь ] || Vowels "€" "+" _ ;
define PossXxXPoss26848XxXR3 [ и н ь ] -> [ һ и н ь ] || Vowels "{" "+" _ ;
define PossXxXPoss26848XxXR4 [ и н ь ] -> [ һ и н ь ] || Vowels "+" _ ;
define PossXxXPoss26852XxXR1 н -> 0 || н "^" "+" _ ь ;
define PossXxXPoss26852XxXR2 н -> 0 || н "+" _ ь ;
define Per2XxX2PerPlOrphV126863XxXR1 а -> ә || SoftVowels [?*] "+" т _ ;
define ParNumXxXParNum26880XxXR1 [ а д ] -> [ ә д ] || SoftVowels [?*] "+" "^" _  ;
define ParNumXxXParNum26880XxXR2 [ а д ] -> [ һ а д ] || Vowels "+" "^" _ ;
define ParNumXxXParNum26880XxXR3 [ ә д ] -> [ һ ә д ] || Vowels "+" "^" _ ;
define OrdNumXxXOrdNum26881XxXR1 н -> 0 || _ "+" д в а р ;
define OrdNumXxXOrdNum26881XxXR2 [ д в а р ] -> [ д в ә р ] || SoftVowels [?*] "+" _  ;
define OrdNumXxXOrdNum26882XxXR1 н -> 0 || _ "+" д г ч ;
define NumberAnimXxXPl26884XxXR1 н -> 0 || _ "+" н р ;
define NumberAnimXxXPl26884XxXR2 [ н р ] -> с || Vowels "ß" "+" _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCaus126903XxXR1 а -> ә || SoftVowels [?*] "+" г _ ;
define VerbVoiceXxXCaus226915XxXR1 у -> ү || SoftVowels [?*] "+" _ л ;
define VerbVoiceXxXResp26951XxXR1 л -> 0 || л "+" _ д ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR1 [ а а ] -> [ а ] || ".#." "^" _ "+" м у д ".#." ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR2 [ а а ] -> [ а ] || ".#." "^" _ Cons "+" м у д ".#." ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR3 [ а а ] -> [ а ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ "+" м у д ".#." ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR4 [ а а ] -> [ а ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ Cons "+" м у д ".#." ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR5 [ ә ә ] -> [ ә ] || ".#." "^" _ "+" м у д ".#." ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR6 [ ә ә ] -> [ ә ] || ".#." "^" _ Cons "+" м у д ".#." ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR7 [ ә ә ] -> [ ә ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ "+" м у д ".#." ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR8 [ ә ә ] -> [ ә ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ Cons "+" м у д ".#." ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR9 [ е е ] -> [ е ] || ".#." "^" _ "+" м у д ".#." ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR10 [ е е ] -> [ е ] || ".#." "^" _ Cons "+" м у д ".#." ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR11 [ е е ] -> [ е ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ "+" м у д ".#." ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR12 [ е е ] -> [ е ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ Cons "+" м у д ".#." ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR13 [ и и ] -> [ и ] || ".#." "^" _ "+" м у д ".#." ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR14 [ и и ] -> [ и ] || ".#." "^" _ Cons "+" м у д ".#." ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR15 [ и и ] -> [ и ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ "+" м у д ".#." ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR16 [ и и ] -> [ и ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ Cons "+" м у д ".#." ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR17 [ о о ] -> [ о ] || ".#." "^" _ "+" м у д ".#." ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR18 [ о о ] -> [ о ] || ".#." "^" _ Cons "+" м у д ".#." ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR19 [ о о ] -> [ о ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ "+" м у д ".#." ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR20 [ о о ] -> [ о ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ Cons "+" м у д ".#." ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR21 [ ө ө ] -> [ ө ] || ".#." "^" _ "+" м у д ".#." ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR22 [ ө ө ] -> [ ө ] || ".#." "^" _ Cons "+" м у д ".#." ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR23 [ ө ө ] -> [ ө ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ "+" м у д ".#." ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR24 [ ө ө ] -> [ ө ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ Cons "+" м у д ".#." ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR25 [ у у ] -> [ у ] || ".#." "^" _ "+" м у д ".#." ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR26 [ у у ] -> [ у ] || ".#." "^" _ Cons "+" м у д ".#." ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR27 [ у у ] -> [ у ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ "+" м у д ".#." ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR28 [ у у ] -> [ у ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ Cons "+" м у д ".#." ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR29 [ ү ү ] -> [ ү ] || ".#." "^" _ "+" м у д ".#." ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR30 [ ү ү ] -> [ ү ] || ".#." "^" _ Cons "+" м у д ".#." ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR31 [ ү ү ] -> [ ү ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ "+" м у д ".#." ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR32 [ ү ү ] -> [ ү ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ Cons "+" м у д ".#." ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR33 [ м у д ] -> с || ".#." Vowels "+" _ ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR34 [ м у д ] -> с || ".#." Cons Vowels "+" _ ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR35 [ м у д ] -> с || ".#." "^" Vowels "+" _ ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR36 [ м у д ] -> с || ".#." Cons "^" Vowels "+" _ ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR37 н -> 0 || _ "+" м у д ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR38 н -> 0 || _ "€" "+" м у д ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR39 [ м у д ] -> с || н "@" "+" _ ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR40 [ м у д ] -> д || "€" "+" _ ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR41 [ м у д ] -> д || "^"[?*] "+" _ ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR42 [ м у д ] -> с || SoftLetter "+" _ ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR43 [ м у д ] -> с || Vowels LabCons "+" _ ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR44 [ м у д ] -> с || Vowels "+" _ ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR45 [ м у д ] -> с || й "+" _ ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR46 [ м у д ] -> с || х "+" _ ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR47 [ м у д ] -> с || "ß" "+" _ ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR48 м -> 0 || PluralCons "+" _ у д ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR49 м -> 0 || PluralCons "ɛ" "+" _ у д ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR50 у -> ү || SoftVowels [?*] "+" _ д ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR51 [ м у д ] -> с || Cons ConsSHS "+" _ ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR52 [ м у д ] -> с || Cons ConsSHS "ɛ" "+" _ ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR53 м -> г || NGCon "+" _ у д ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR54 у -> ү || SoftVowels [?*] "+" г _ д ;
define NumberXxXPl26959XxXR55 у -> ү || SoftVowels [?*] "+" м _ д ;
define ReflPart5XxXReflPart26962XxXR1 [ а н ] -> [ һ а н ] || Cons н "+" _  ;
define ReflPart5XxXReflPart26962XxXR2 [ а н ] -> [ һ а н ] || Cons н "@" "+" _  ;
define ReflPart5XxXReflPart26962XxXR3 [ а н ] -> [ һ а н ] || Vowels "+" _ ;
define ReflPart5XxXReflPart26962XxXR4 [ а н ] -> [ һ а н ] || Vowels "{" "+" _ ;
define ReflPart5XxXReflPart26962XxXR5 [ ә н ] -> [ һ ә н ] || Cons н "+" _  ;
define ReflPart5XxXReflPart26962XxXR6 [ ә н ] -> [ һ ә н ] || Cons н "@" "+" _  ;
define ReflPart5XxXReflPart26962XxXR7 [ ә н ] -> [ һ ә н ] || Vowels "+" _ ;
define ReflPart5XxXReflPart26962XxXR8 [ ә н ] -> [ һ ә н ] || Vowels "{" "+" _ ;
define ReflPart5XxXReflPart26962XxXR9 а -> ә || SoftVowels [?*] "+" _ н ;
define ReflPart5XxXReflPart26962XxXR10 а -> ә || SoftVowels [?*] "+" һ _ н ;
define ReflPart5XxXReflPart26962XxXR11 ь -> 0 || _ "+" а н ;
